Washington statutes.
RCW 14.08.070

Prior acquisition of airport property validated.

Any acquisition of property within or without the limits of any municipality for airports and other air navigation facilities, or of airport protection privileges, heretofore made by any such municipality in any manner, together with the conveyance and acceptance thereof, is hereby legalized and made valid and effective.

[ 1945 c 182 s 4; Rem. Supp. 1945 s 2722-33.]